Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6315.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9. (1) The unemployment insurance agency or its duly appointed authorized agents may examine or copy the books, records, and papers of any an employing unit relating to any a requirement pertaining to this act. Any member of However, the unemployment insurance agency or its duly authorized agents shall not require that an employing unit provide a book, record, or paper for examining or copying in a form other than the form in which the book, record, or paper then exists. (2) The unemployment insurance agency may issue a subpoena that requires any a person to do any of the following: (a) Appear before the unemployment insurance agency or its duly authorized agents at any a reasonable time and place. (b) Be examined with reference to any matter within the scope of the inquiry or investigation being conducted by the unemployment insurance agency. (c) Produce any books, records, or papers pertaining to the question involved. (3) (2) Any member of the The unemployment insurance agency or its duly authorized agents may administer an oath or affirmation to a witness in any a matter before the unemployment insurance agency, certify to official acts, and take depositions. (4) (3) If a person disobeys a subpoena, the unemployment insurance agency or the party on whose behalf the subpoena was issued may invoke the aid of any a circuit court of this state to require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers pertaining to the question involved. Any of the circuit courts of this state within the jurisdiction of which the inquiry is carried on may, if the refusal to obey a subpoena continues, issue an order requiring the person to appear before the unemployment insurance agency or its duly authorized agents and to produce books, records, and papers if so ordered, and give evidence touching related to the matter in question. The circuit court may punish any a failure to obey its order as a contempt of court. (5) (4) An individual is not excused from testifying or from producing any books, records, or papers in any an investigation, or upon any a hearing, when if ordered to do so by the unemployment insurance agency or its duly authorized agents, on the ground that because the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, may tend to incriminate the individual or subject the individual to a criminal penalty. An individual must not be prosecuted or subjected to any a criminal penalty for, or on account of, any a transaction made or thing concerning which the individual is compelled, upon the claiming of the individual's privilege to testify. An individual who testifies is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in testifying.